Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.062

Warrants—Presentation—Cancellation.

Should the payee or legal holder of any warrant drawn against the state treasury fail to present the warrant for payment within one hundred eighty days of the date of its issue or, if registered and drawing interest, within one hundred eighty days of its call, the state treasurer shall enter the same as canceled on the books of his or her office.

Should the payee or legal owner of such a canceled warrant thereafter present it for payment, the state treasurer may, upon proper showing by affidavit and the delivery of the warrant into his or her possession, issue a new warrant in lieu thereof, and the state treasurer is authorized to pay the new warrant.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5036; 1986 c 99 s 1; 1981 c 10 s 2; 1965 c 8 s 43.08.062. Prior: 1890 p 638 s 13; RRS s 11008; prior: 1883 p 61 s 1. Formerly RCW 43.09.100.]